Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1094.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-H.1HISTORIC HOMEOWNERSHIP PRESERVATION INCENTIVE TAX CREDITSection 1701-H.1. Scope of article.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 This article relates to the historic homeownership preservation incentive tax credit.Section 1702-H.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified historic property." A property located within this Commonwealth that is:(1) l isted individually in the National Register of Historic Places;(2) located in a historic district listed in the National Register of Historic Places and identified as a contributing building in the National Register of Historic Places or as determined by the commission;(3) individually designated as a historic property by local ordinance; or(4) located in a historic district that is:(i) certified by the commission under the act of June 13, 1961 (P.L.282, No.167), entitled "An act authorizing counties, cities, boroughs, incorporated towns and townships to create historic districts within their geographic boundaries; providing for the appointment of Boards of Historical Architectural Review; empowering governing bodies of political subdivisions to protect the distinctive historical character of these districts and to regulate the erection, reconstruction, alteration, restoration, demolition or razing of buildings within the historic districts";( ii) established by a municipality that has adopted a home rule charter; or20250HB1094PN1189 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) established by a municipality under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code."Commission." The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission."Completed project." The completion of the rehabilitation of a qualified historic home in accordance with a qualified rehabilitation plan. If the property is unoccupied, the owner shall obtain an occupancy certificate prior to completing the project."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Internal Revenue Code." 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq. (Internal Revenue Code of 1986), as amended."Qualified census tract." A federally qualified census tract or area of chronic economic distress that is identified by the department and is:(1) at 100% or below the State family median income level; or(2) designated as a qualified opportunity zone under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-1 (relating to designation)."Qualified expenditures." As follows:(1) The costs and expenses that:(i) are properly chargeable to a capital account;(ii) are incurred by a qualified taxpayer in the rehabilitation of a qualified historic home pursuant to a qualified rehabilitation plan; and(iii) adhere to the guidelines for eligible rehabilitation expenditures developed under section 1705-H.1.20250HB1094PN1189 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term does not include:(i) The cost of acquiring a building or interest in a building.(ii) An expenditure attributable to the enlargement of an existing building.(iii) Expenditures related to interior improvements or maintenance, except as necessary to stabilize or structurally support the qualified historic home's exteriors.(3) The commission may develop guidelines on the types of costs and expenses that are appropriately determined to be qualified expenditures."Qualified historic home." As follows:(1) A certified historic property or portion of the property of an applicant that is:(i) located in a qualified census tract;(ii) owned by the applicant; and(iii) being used, or within a reasonable period will be used, by the applicant as the applicant's principal residence.(2) The following apply to the property described under paragraph (1):(i) The property may consist of part of a multiple dwelling or multiple purpose building or series of buildings.(ii) If only a portion of a building is used as the principal residence, only those qualified expenditures that are properly allocable to that portion shall be eligible under this article to apply for tax credits calculated at the percentage available to owner-20250HB1094PN1189 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupants."Qualified rehabilitation plan." A plan to substantially rehabilitate a qualified historic home that is approved by the commission as being consistent with the Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties as adopted by the United States Secretary of the Interior. A plan shall be treated as substantially rehabilitated if qualified expenditures total $5,000 or more."Qualified tax liability." Tax liability imposed on a taxpayer under Article III. The term does not include any tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III."Qualified taxpayer." An individual who:(1) is subject to a tax imposed under Article III; and(2) owns a qualified historic home.Section 1703-H.1. Tax credit certificates.(a) Application.--(1) A qualified taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit certificate under this section.(2) The application shall be on the form required by the department and shall include a qualified rehabilitation plan.(3) The department shall establish an application processing fee. The following apply:(i) The fee structure shall be tiered based on the amount of tax credits requested.(ii) In no case shall the fee exceed $100.(4) The proceeds of the fee under paragraph (3) shall be deposited into the Historic Homeowner Preservation Tax Credit Administration Fund, which is established in the State Treasury. The money in the Historic Homeowner Preservation Tax Credit Administration Fund shall be appropriated on a 20250HB1094PN1189 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 continuing basis to the department and used by the commission and the department to offset the costs of the review of tax credit applications and awarding of tax credit certificates.(5) The department shall begin accepting applications for credit certificates on June 1 and close the initial application period on June 30.(b) Review, recommendation and approval.--(1) The department shall forward applications received under this section to the commission for review.(2) The commission shall:(i) Review the proposed rehabilitation plan in each application.(ii) Verify that the building is a qualified historic home.(iii) By December 1, provide the department with a list of eligible projects.(3) The department shall allocate the credits and release a list of allocated projects within 15 business days of the receipt of the list under paragraph (2)(iii). Applicants with approved allocations shall be provided with an award letter.(4) Any amount of tax credit certificates up to the annual program limit of $3,000,000 not awarded within the initial application period shall be available on a first-come, first-served basis through a process determined by the department.(5) The applicant shall notify the commission of the completed project and shall submit proof of qualified expenditures within three years of the issuance of the award letter by the department under paragraph (3). The commission 20250HB1094PN1189 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall notify the department of verification of a completed project within 30 days and shall notify the department of the amount of qualified expenditures incurred by the taxpayer in connection with the completed project.(6) If the department has approved the application and received notification of a completed project, it shall issue the qualified taxpayer a tax credit certificate within 45 days of the receipt of an approved, completed project. A tax credit certificate issued under this section may not exceed 20% of qualified expenditures determined by the commission to have been incurred by the qualified taxpayer in connection with the completed project.(7) In granting tax credit certificates under this article, the department may not grant more than $20,000 in tax credit certificates to a single qualified taxpayer or qualified taxpayers in a single household in any fiscal year.Section 1704-H.1. Claiming tax credit.Upon presenting a tax credit certificate to the Department of Revenue, a qualified taxpayer may claim a tax credit against the qualified tax liability of the qualified taxpayer for the taxable year in which the project was completed. If the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the Department of Revenue may issue a refund under the procedures specified in section 346.Section 1705-H.1. Administration.(a) Guidelines.--The department, the commission and the Department of Revenue shall jointly develop written guidelines for the implementation of the provisions of this article.(b) Forms.--The department, in conjunction with the commission, shall develop the application forms required under 20250HB1094PN1189 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 1703-H.1(a)(2).Section 1706-H.1. Annual report to General Assembly.(a) Submittal.--By October 1, 2027, and October 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the tax credit under this article to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and the minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The report under this section must include:(1) The list of completed projects that have been awarded tax credits under this article.(2) The amount of tax credits under this article received by each completed project.(3) Total project costs and the amount of private investment in each completed project.(4) The total number of completed projects placed into service in the past year that were vacant for at least 12 months prior to commencement of rehabilitation work.(5) The total number of completed projects placed into service in the past year that had not paid property taxes for 20250HB1094PN1189 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at least 12 months prior to the commencement of rehabilitation work.(c) Public information.--Notwithstanding any law providing for the confidentiality of tax records, the information in the report under this section shall be public information and shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(d) Review of tax credit program.--The department, in cooperation with the commission, shall undertake a review of the tax credit program under this article to determine the effectiveness of the program in preserving and rehabilitating the Commonwealth's historic homes and the impact these efforts have had on the stimulation of investment in this Commonwealth. The results of the review shall be included in the annual report due October 1, 2027.Section 1707-H.1. Application of Internal Revenue Code.The provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 47 (relating to rehabilitation credit) and the regulations promulgated regarding those provisions shall apply to the Department of Revenue's interpretation and administration of the credit provided under this article without regard to ratably allocating the credit over a five-year period as required by 26 U.S.C. § 47(a). References to the Internal Revenue Code shall mean the sections of the Internal Revenue Code as existing on any date of interpretation of this article, except that if those sections of the Internal Revenue Code referenced in this article are repealed or terminated, references to the Internal Revenue Code shall mean those sections last having full force and effect without regard to ratably allocating the credit over a five-year period as required by 26 U.S.C. § 47(a). If after repeal or 20250HB1094PN1189 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 termination the Internal Revenue Code sections are revised or reenacted, references in this article to Internal Revenue Code sections shall mean those revised or reenacted sections.Section 1708-H.1. Limitation.Taxpayers shall not be entitled to apply for tax credits under this article after February 1, 2035.Section 1709-H.1. Tax credit administration.The tax credit provided for under this article is subject to the provisions of Article XVII-A.1.Section 1710-H.1. Administrative costs.(a) Commission.--The commission may use no more than 3% of money allocated for the tax credit program under this article for administrative costs associated with the tax credit program.(b) Department.--T he department may use no more than 3% of money allocated for the tax credit program under this article for administrative costs associated with the tax credit program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1094PN1189 - 10 - 1234567891011121314151617